Florida, session 2026, SB990.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 107 108 Section 1.âPresent subsections (8) through (11), (12) 109 through (14), and (15) of section 628.901, Florida Statutes, are 110 redesignated as subsections (9) through (12), (19) through (21), 111 and (23), respectively, new subsections (8) and (13) through 112 (15) and subsections (16) through (18) and (22) are added to 113 that section, and subsection (2) and present subsection (14) of 114 that section are amended, to read: 115 628.901âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 116 (2)ââCaptive insurance companyâ means a domestic insurer 117 established under this part. A captive insurance company 118 includes a protected cell captive insurance company, pure 119 captive insurance company, special purpose captive insurance 120 company, or industrial insured captive insurance company formed 121 and licensed under this part. 122 (8)ââGeneral accountâ means all assets and liabilities of a 123 protected cell captive insurance company not attributable to a 124 protected cell. 125 (13)ââParticipantâ means a person or an entity, and any 126 affiliate of such person or entity, which is insured by a 127 protected cell captive insurance company, if the losses of the 128 participant are limited through a participant contract. 129 (14)ââParticipant contractâ means a contract by which a 130 protected cell captive insurance company insures the risks of a 131 participant and limits the losses of each such participant to 132 its pro rata share of the assets of one or more protected cells 133 identified in such contract. 134 (15)ââProtected cellâ means a separate account established 135 by a protected cell captive insurance company formed or licensed 136 under this part, in which account an identified pool of assets 137 and liabilities is segregated and insulated by means of this 138 part from the remainder of the protected cell captive insurance 139 companyâs assets and liabilities in accordance with the terms of 140 one or more participant contracts to fund the liabilities of the 141 protected cell captive insurance company with respect to the 142 participants as set forth in the participant contracts. 143 (16)ââProtected cell assetsâ means all assets, contract 144 rights, and general intangibles identified with and attributable 145 to a specific protected cell of a protected cell captive 146 insurance company. 147 (17)ââProtected cell captive insurance companyâ means a 148 captive insurance company: 149 (a)âIn which the minimum capital and surplus required by 150 this part are provided by one or more sponsors; 151 (b)âThat is formed or licensed under this part; 152 (c)âThat insures the risks of separate participants through 153 participant contracts; and 154 (d)âThat funds its liability to each participant through 155 one or more protected cells and segregates the assets of each 156 protected cell from the assets of other protected cells and from 157 the assets of the protected cell captive insurance companyâs 158 general account. 159 (18)ââProtected cell liabilitiesâ means all liabilities and 160 other obligations identified with and attributed to a specific 161 protected cell of a protected cell captive insurance company. 162 (21)(14)ââSpecial purpose captive insurance companyâ means 163 a captive insurance company that is formed or licensed under 164 this part which chapter that does not meet the definition of any 165 other type of captive insurance company defined in this section. 166 (22)ââSponsorâ means any person or entity that is approved 167 by the office to provide all or part of the capital and surplus 168 required by this part and to organize and operate a protected 169 cell captive insurance company. 170 Section 2.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (1) of 171 section 628.905, Florida Statutes, to read: 172 628.905âLicensing; authority.â 173 (1)âA captive insurance company, if permitted by its 174 charter or articles of incorporation, may apply to the office 175 for a license to do any and all insurance authorized under the 176 insurance code, other than workersâ compensation and employerâs 177 liability, life, health, personal motor vehicle, and personal 178 residential property insurance, except that: 179 (f)âA protected cell captive insurance company may only 180 insure the risks of its protected cell participants. 181 Section 3.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 628.907, 182 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 183 628.907âMinimum capital and net assets requirements; 184 restriction on payment of dividends.â 185 (1)âA captive insurance company may not be issued a license 186 unless it possesses and thereafter maintains the following 187 applicable unimpaired paid-in capital requirements of: 188 (a)âIn the case of a protected cell captive insurance 189 company, at least $100,000. 190 (b)âIn the case of a pure captive insurance company, at 191 least $100,000.; 192 (c)(b)âIn the case of an industrial insured captive 193 insurance company incorporated as a stock insurer, at least 194 $200,000.; and 195 (d)(c)âIn the case of a special purpose captive insurance 196 company, an amount determined by the office after giving due 197 consideration to the companyâs business plan, feasibility study, 198 and pro forma financial statements and projections, including 199 the nature of the risks to be insured. 200 (2)âThe office may not issue a license to a captive 201 insurance company incorporated as a nonprofit corporation unless 202 the company possesses and maintains the following applicable 203 unrestricted net assets requirements of: 204 (a)âIn the case of a protected cell captive insurance 205 company, at least $100,000. 206 (b)âIn the case of a pure captive insurance company, at 207 least $250,000. 208 (c)(b)âIn the case of a special purpose captive insurance 209 company, an amount determined by the office after giving due 210 consideration to the companyâs business plan, feasibility study, 211 and pro forma financial statements and projections, including 212 the nature of the risks to be insured. 213 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 628.908, Florida 214 Statutes, is amended to read: 215 628.908âSurplus requirements; restriction on payment of 216 dividends.â 217 (1)âThe office may not issue a license to a captive 218 insurance company unless the company possesses and maintains the 219 following applicable unimpaired surplus requirements of: 220 (a)âIn the case of a pure captive insurance company, at 221 least $150,000. 222 (b)âIn the case of a protected cell captive insurance 223 company, at least $100,000. 224 (c)âIn the case of an industrial insured captive insurance 225 company incorporated as a stock insurer, at least $300,000. 226 (d)(c)âIn the case of an industrial insured captive 227 insurance company incorporated as a mutual insurer, at least 228 $500,000. 229 (e)(d)âIn the case of a special purpose captive insurance 230 company, an amount determined by the office after giving due 231 consideration to the companyâs business plan, feasibility study, 232 and pro forma financial statements and projections, including 233 the nature of the risks to be insured. 234 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 628.909, Florida 235 Statutes, is amended to read: 236 628.909âApplicability of other laws.â 237 (1)âThe Florida Insurance Code does not apply to captive 238 insurance companies, protected cell captive insurance companies, 239 or industrial insured captive insurance companies except as 240 provided in this part and subsections (2) and (3). 241 Section 6.âSection 628.921, Florida Statutes, is created to 242 read: 243 628.921âProtected cell captive insurance companies.â 244 (1)âOne or more sponsors may form a protected cell captive 245 insurance company under this part. 246 (2)âA protected cell captive insurance company must be 247 incorporated as a stock insurer with its capital divided into 248 shares and held by the stockholders, as a mutual corporation, as 249 a nonprofit corporation with one or more members, or as a 250 limited liability company. 251 (3)âIn addition to the information required by chapter 624, 252 each applicant protected cell captive insurance company must 253 file all of the following information with the office: 254 (a)âMaterials demonstrating how the applicant will account 255 for the loss and expense experience of each protected cell at a 256 level of detail found to be sufficient by the office, and how it 257 will report such experience to the office. 258 (b)âA statement acknowledging that all financial records of 259 the applicant, including records pertaining to any protected 260 cells, must be made available for inspection or examination by 261 the office or the officeâs designated agent. 262 (c)âAll contracts or sample contracts between the applicant 263 and any participants. 264 (d)âEvidence that expenses will be allocated to each 265 protected cell in a fair and equitable manner. 266 (4)âA protected cell captive insurance company formed or 267 licensed under this part may establish and maintain one or more 268 incorporated or unincorporated protected cells, to insure risks 269 of one or more participants, subject to all of the following 270 conditions: 271 (a)1.âA protected cell captive insurance company may 272 establish one or more protected cells if the office has approved 273 in writing a plan of operation or amendments to a plan of 274 operation submitted by the protected cell captive insurance 275 company with respect to each protected cell. A plan of operation 276 must include, but is not limited to, the specific business 277 objectives and investment guidelines of the protected cell. 278 However, the office may require additional information in the 279 plan of operation. The office may make the approval of a plan of 280 operation or amendments to a plan of operation effective as of 281 any date on or before the date the approval is signed so long as 282 the effective date is no earlier than the date on which the plan 283 of operation or amendments to the plan of operation were filed 284 with the office. 285 2.âUpon the officeâs written approval of the plan of 286 operation, the protected cell captive insurance company, in 287 accordance with the approved plan of operation, may attribute 288 insurance obligations with respect to its insurance business to 289 the protected cell. 290 3.âA protected cell must have its own distinct name or 291 designation, which must include the words âprotected cellâ or 292 âincorporated cell.â Such names or designations may also be 293 reasonably abbreviated, including, without limitation, PC or 294 P.C. for âprotected cellâ; IC, I.C., IPC, or I.P.C. for 295 âincorporated cellâ; and SC, S.C., SPC, or S.P.C. for âseries 296 cell.â 297 4.âThe protected cell captive insurance company shall 298 transfer all assets attributable to a protected cell to one or 299 more separately established and identified protected cell 300 accounts bearing the name or designation of that protected cell. 301 Protected cell assets must be held in the protected cell 302 accounts for the purpose of satisfying the obligations of that 303 protected cell. 304 5.âAn incorporated protected cell may be organized and 305 operated in any form of business organization authorized by the 306 office, including, but not limited to, an individual series of a 307 limited liability company under chapter 605. Each incorporated 308 protected cell of a protected cell captive insurance company 309 must be treated as a captive insurer for purposes of this part 310 and has the power to enter into contracts, including an 311 individual series of a limited liability company. Unless 312 otherwise permitted by the organizational documents of a 313 protected cell captive insurance company, each incorporated 314 protected cell of the protected cell captive insurance company 315 must have the same directors, secretary, and registered office 316 as the protected cell captive insurance company. 317 6.âAll attributions of assets and liabilities between a 318 protected cell and the general account must be in accordance 319 with the plan of operation and participant contracts approved by 320 the office. A protected cell captive insurance company may not 321 make other attributions of assets or liabilities between the 322 protected cell captive insurance companyâs general account and 323 its protected cells. Any attribution of assets and liabilities 324 between the general account and a protected cell must be in cash 325 or in readily marketable securities with established market 326 values. 327 (b)âThe creation of a protected cell does not create, with 328 respect to that protected cell, a legal person separate from the 329 protected cell captive insurance company unless the protected 330 cell is an incorporated cell. Amounts attributed to a protected 331 cell under this part, including assets transferred to a 332 protected cell account, are owned by the protected cell. A 333 protected cell captive insurance company may not act as, or hold 334 itself out to be, a trustee of the protected cell assets of the 335 protected cell account. Notwithstanding this subsection, a 336 protected cell captive insurance company may permit a security 337 interest to attach to the assets of a protected cell assets or a 338 protected cell account if the security interest is in favor of a 339 creditor of that protected cell and is otherwise authorized by 340 applicable law. 341 (c)âThis subsection may not be construed to prohibit the 342 protected cell captive insurance company from contracting with 343 or arranging for an investment advisor, commodity trading 344 advisor, or other third party to manage the protected cell 345 assets of a protected cell if all remuneration, expenses, and 346 other compensation of the third-party advisor or manager are 347 payable from the protected cell assets of that protected cell 348 and not from the protected cell assets of other protected cells 349 or the assets of the protected cell captive insurance companyâs 350 general account. 351 (d)1.âA protected cell captive insurance company must 352 establish administrative and accounting procedures necessary to 353 properly identify the one or more protected cells of the 354 protected cell captive insurance company and the protected cell 355 assets and protected cell liabilities attributable to the 356 protected cells. The directors of a protected cell captive 357 insurance company must keep protected cell assets and protected 358 cell liabilities: 359 a.âSeparate and separately identifiable from the assets and 360 liabilities of the protected cell captive insurance companyâs 361 general account; and 362 b.âAttributable to one protected cell separate and 363 separately identifiable from protected cell assets and protected 364 cell liabilities attributable to other protected cells. 365 2.âIf subparagraph 1. is violated, the remedy of tracing 366 applies to protected cell assets that have been commingled with 367 the protected cell assets of other protected cells or with the 368 assets of the protected cell captive insurance companyâs general 369 account. The remedy of tracing may not be construed as 370 exclusive. 371 (e)âWhen establishing a protected cell, the protected cell 372 captive insurance company must attribute to the protected cell 373 assets a value at least equal to the reserves and other 374 insurance liabilities attributed to that protected cell. 375 (f)âEach protected cell must be accounted for separately on 376 the books and records of the protected cell captive insurance 377 company to reflect the financial condition and results of 378 operations of such protected cell, net income or loss, dividends 379 or other distributions to participants, and such other factors 380 as may be provided in the participant contract or required by 381 the office. 382 (g)âAn asset of a protected cell may not be charged with, 383 or otherwise made liable for, any liability arising out of 384 insurance business conducted by the protected cell captive 385 insurance company on behalf of any other protected cell or its 386 general account. 387 (h)âA protected cell captive insurance company may not 388 sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer assets between or among 389 any of its protected cells without the consent of such protected 390 cells. 391 (i)âA protected cell captive insurance company may not 392 sell, exchange, transfer, or otherwise distribute assets, or pay 393 any dividend or distribution, from a protected cell to the 394 company or to a participant without the approval of the office. 395 The office may not approve any sale, exchange, transfer, 396 dividend, or distribution that would result in the insolvency or 397 impairment of a protected cell. 398 (j)âAll attributions of assets and liabilities to the 399 protected cells and the general account must be in accordance 400 with the plan of operation approved by the office. A protected 401 cell captive insurance company may not attribute assets or 402 liabilities between its general account and any protected cell, 403 or between any protected cells. The protected cell captive 404 insurance company must attribute all insurance obligations, 405 assets, and liabilities relating to a reinsurance contract 406 entered into with respect to a protected cell to such protected 407 cell. The performance under such reinsurance contract and any 408 tax benefits, losses, refunds, or credits allocated pursuant to 409 a tax allocation agreement to which the protected cell captive 410 insurance company is a party, including any payments made by or 411 due to be made to the protected cell captive insurance company 412 pursuant to the terms of such agreement, must reflect the 413 insurance obligations, assets, and liabilities relating to the 414 reinsurance contract which are attributed to such protected 415 cell. 416 (k)âIn connection with the conservation, rehabilitation, or 417 liquidation of a protected cell captive insurance company, the 418 assets and liabilities of a protected cell must, to the extent 419 the office determines they are separable, at all times be kept 420 separate from, and may not be commingled with, those of other 421 protected cells and the protected cell captive insurance 422 company. 423 (l)âEach protected cell captive insurance company must 424 annually file with the office such financial reports as required 425 by the office. Any such financial report must include, without 426 limitation, accounting statements detailing the financial 427 experience of each protected cell. 428 (m)âEach protected cell captive insurance company must 429 notify the office in writing within 10 business days of any 430 protected cell that is insolvent or otherwise unable to meet its 431 claim or expense obligations. 432 (n)âA participant contract may not take effect without the 433 officeâs prior written approval. The addition of each new 434 protected cell, the withdrawal of any participant, or the 435 termination of any existing protected cell constitutes a change 436 in the plan of operation requiring the officeâs prior written 437 approval. 438 (o)âThe business written by a protected cell captive 439 insurance company, with respect to each protected cell, must be: 440 1.âFronted by an insurance company licensed under the laws 441 of any state; 442 2.âReinsured by a reinsurer authorized or approved by this 443 state; or 444 3.âSecured by a trust fund in the United States for the 445 benefit of policyholders and claimants or funded by an 446 irrevocable letter of credit or other arrangement that is 447 acceptable to the office. The amount of security provided may 448 not be less than the reserves associated with those liabilities 449 which are neither fronted nor reinsured, including reserves for 450 losses, allocated loss adjustment expenses, incurred but not 451 reported losses, and unearned premiums for business written 452 through the participantâs protected cell. The office may require 453 the protected cell captive insurance company to increase the 454 funding of any security arrangement established under this 455 paragraph. If the form of security is a letter of credit, the 456 letter of credit must be issued or confirmed by a bank approved 457 by the office. A trust maintained pursuant to this paragraph 458 must be established in a form and upon such terms as approved by 459 the office. 460 (p)âNotwithstanding this part or other laws of this state, 461 and in addition to subsection (6), in the event of an insolvency 462 of a protected cell captive insurance company where the office 463 determines that one or more protected cells remain solvent, the 464 office may separate such cells from the protected cell captive 465 insurance company and may allow, on application of the protected 466 cell captive insurance company, for the conversion of such 467 protected cells into one or more new or existing protected cell 468 captive insurance companies, or one or more other captive 469 insurance companies, pursuant to such plan of operation as the 470 office deems acceptable. 471 (q)âBiographical affidavits are not required for 472 participants in unincorporated cells. However, biographical 473 affidavits are required for owners of incorporated cells, 474 including series members of a series limited liability company. 475 (r)âA protected cell captive insurance company formed or 476 licensed under this part may establish and operate both 477 unincorporated and incorporated protected cells. 478 (5)âNotwithstanding subsection (4), the assets of two or 479 more protected cells may be combined for purposes of investment, 480 and such combination may not be construed as defeating the 481 segregation of such assets for accounting or other purposes. 482 Notwithstanding any other provision of the insurance code, the 483 office may approve the use of alternative reliable methods for 484 the valuation of protected cell assets and liabilities and for 485 the rating of risks attributable to a protected cell. 486 (6)âUpon any order of supervision, rehabilitation, or 487 liquidation of a protected cell captive insurance company, the 488 receiver shall manage the assets and liabilities of the 489 protected cell captive insurance company pursuant to this part. 490 (7)(a)âAssets of a protected cell may not be used to pay 491 any expenses or claims other than those attributable to such 492 protected cell. 493 (b)âA protected cell captive insurance companyâs capital 494 and surplus must at all times be available to pay any expenses 495 of or claims against the protected cell captive insurance 496 company. 497 (8)(a)âThe pleadings in any legal action brought by or 498 against a protected cell captive insurance company must specify 499 which protected cell or cells are or should be named a party to 500 the suit. If the general account is party to the suit, such 501 account must be separately identified in the pleadings as if it 502 were a protected cell. 503 (b)âA legal action brought against a protected cell captive 504 insurance company which does not specify one or more protected 505 cells shall be deemed to have been brought against the general 506 account only. 507 (c)âAny protected cell that is not named in the pleadings 508 of the legal action may not be deemed to be a party to the legal 509 action. Any protected cell that is erroneously named as a party 510 or named without proper cause is entitled to prompt dismissal 511 from the legal action. 512 (d)âUnless specified by the plan of operation, participant 513 contract, or other prior contractual agreement, the assets of 514 one protected cell may not be encumbered or seized to satisfy 515 the obligations of or a judgment against any other protected 516 cell. A protected cell does not have a duty to defend the rights 517 and obligations of any other protected cell. 518 (e)âIn any legal action involving a protected cell captive 519 insurance company or a protected cell, any papers, documents, or 520 property of a nonparty protected cell must be afforded the same 521 status during discovery as the documents or property of any 522 other unrelated third party. A nonparty protected cell has 523 standing to appear and petition for any appropriate relief to 524 protect the confidentiality of its papers or documents. 525 (9)(a)1.âUpon the application of a protected cell captive 526 insurance company, one of its protected cells may be converted 527 to any form of captive insurance company authorized pursuant to 528 this part with the consent of the office. Upon compliance with 529 this part, the office may issue to the converting protected cell 530 a certificate of authority with an effective date of its 531 original date of formation as a protected cell. 532 2.âIf the converting protected cell is a series of a 533 limited liability company, the protected cell must file 534 organizational documents with the Secretary of State which 535 comply with this part. The organizational documents must include 536 the date of formation as a series of a limited liability 537 company. Upon conversion, the formation date of the series shall 538 be deemed the formation date of the converted protected cell. 539 The converted protected cell shall possess all assets and 540 liabilities, including outstanding insurance liabilities, owned 541 by the predecessor series. 542 3.âIf the converting protected cell is any other type of 543 incorporated protected cell entity, the converting protected 544 cell must submit amended organizational documents to the 545 Secretary of State which comply with this part. 546 4.âIf the converting protected cell is neither a series of 547 a limited liability company nor an incorporated protected cell, 548 the protected cell must file organizational documents with the 549 Secretary of State which comply with this part. The 550 organizational documents must include the date of formation as a 551 protected cell. Upon conversion, the formation date of the 552 protected cell is the formation date of the converted protected 553 cell. The converted protected cell shall possess all assets and 554 liabilities, including outstanding insurance liabilities, owned 555 by the predecessor cell. 556 (b)âA captive insurance company may apply to the office for 557 conversion to become a protected cell captive insurance company 558 under any form permitted under this part. Upon compliance with 559 this part, approval by the office, and the filing of amended 560 organizational documents with the Secretary of State, the 561 captive insurance company must be issued a revised certificate 562 of authority. The effective date of the revised protected cell 563 captive insurance companyâs certificate of authority shall 564 remain the same as the effective date of the prior captive 565 insurance company. 566 (c)âWith the consent of both the affected protected cell 567 captive insurance companies and the office, an individual 568 protected cell of a captive insurance company may disaffiliate 569 from one protected cell captive insurance company and affiliate 570 with another protected cell captive insurance company. The 571 office may require the affected protected cell captive insurance 572 companies and the individual protected cell to make necessary 573 changes to their business plans, organizational documents, 574 participation contracts, or other governing documents before 575 approving the change in affiliation. The formation date of a 576 protected cell that affiliates with another protected cell 577 captive insurance company shall be the date of its original 578 formation with the prior protected cell captive insurance 579 company. A protected cell shall maintain and carry over all 580 assets and liabilities, including outstanding insurance 581 liabilities, to the new protected cell captive insurance 582 company. 583 (d)âWith the consent of the affected protected cell captive 584 insurance company or companies, the owners or the participants 585 of the protected cells, and the office, an individual protected 586 cell of a captive insurance company may merge or otherwise 587 combine assets and liabilities with another individual protected 588 cell of a protected cell captive insurance company. The office 589 may require the affected protected cell captive insurance 590 companies and the individual protected cells to make necessary 591 changes to their business plans, organizational documents, 592 participation contracts, or other governing documents before 593 approving the change in affiliation. The formation date of a 594 protected cell that merges or otherwise combines assets and 595 liabilities with another protected cell captive insurance 596 company is the date of the original formation of the surviving 597 protected cell. The surviving protected cell must acquire all of 598 the assets and liabilities, including outstanding insurance 599 liabilities, of the merging protected cell. A hearing is not 600 required for mergers of protected cells effectuated under this 601 section. 602 (e)âSolely for the purposes of annual reports, inspections, 603 examinations, and taxation, the date of final conversion or 604 disaffiliation of a protected cell shall be deemed a termination 605 of that cell from the prior entity. The prior entity shall be 606 responsible for the accounting, oversight, and premium tax on 607 any transactions prior to the date of final conversion or 608 disaffiliation. The successor entity shall be responsible for 609 the accounting, oversight, and premium tax on any transactions 610 on or after the date of final conversion or disaffiliation. 611 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.